Hawaii statutes.
[§134-10.5] Storage of firearm;
responsibility with respect to minors. No person shall store or keep any
firearm on any premises under the person's control if the person knows or
reasonably should know that a minor is likely to gain access to the firearm
without the permission of the parent or guardian of the minor, unless the
person:

(1) Keeps the firearm in a securely locked box or
other container or in a location that a reasonable person would believe to be
secure; or

(2) Carries the firearm on the person or within such
close proximity thereto that the person readily can retrieve and use it as if
it were carried on the person.

For purposes of this section, "minor"
means any person under the age of sixteen years. [L 1992, c 288, §1]

Cross References

Criminally negligent
storage of firearm, see §707-714.5.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next